Tennessee, session 114, HB1522.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-4-116, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection (c) and redesignating the existing subsections accordingly:
(c)
(1) Notwithstanding this section, a member of a uniformed service in
active military service of the United States, as defined in § 58-1-102, who is
stationed outside of this state and not at a military reservation located partially
within the boundary of this state and that of another state under orders of the
member's branch of service and who is seeking to renew a registration for an all-
electric vehicle is exempt from paying any additional registration fee required
under this section.
(2) In order to qualify for the exemption provided in this subsection (c),
the service member shall provide to the county clerk a copy of the official orders
related to the stationing of the service member. The copy of the orders must be
submitted at the time the vehicle registration is renewed.
(3) The exemption provided in this subsection (c) applies only when the
vehicle is titled and registered in the name of the service member, either alone or
jointly with a spouse or lineal relative.
SECTION 2. The Tennessee Code Commission is requested to make an appropriate
update to the cross-reference to Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-4-116(c), found in
HB1522
010143
- 1 -

Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-6-107, to reflect the updated subsection designations
resulting from Section 1.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to registrations renewed on or after that date.
- 2 - 010143